Indiana, session 2026, HB1217.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 28-8-7.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 7.1. Payment of Interest or Yield on Stablecoin
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "foreign payment stablecoin
issuer" has the meaning set forth in 12 U.S.C. 5901(12).
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "permitted payment stablecoin
issuer" has the meaning set forth in 12 U.S.C. 5901(23).
Sec. 3. A permitted payment stablecoin issuer, foreign payment
stablecoin issuer, or person acting on behalf of a permitted
payment stablecoin issuer or foreign payment stablecoin issuer
may not:
(1) pay to a person that holds a payment stablecoin any form
of:
(A) interest; or
(B) yield, whether in cash, tokens, or other consideration;
or
EH 1217—LS 7003/DI 119


(2) provide a person that holds a payment stablecoin an
economic benefit of any kind;
in connection with the person's holding, use, or retention of the
payment stablecoin.
SECTION 2. IC 28-16 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW ARTICLE TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]:
ARTICLE 16. DIGITAL ASSETS
Chapter 1. Definitions
Sec. 1. The definitions in:
(1) this chapter; and
(2) 12 U.S.C. 5901;
apply throughout this article.
Sec. 2. "Department" means the department of financial
institutions.
Sec. 3. "Hardware wallet" means:
(1) a physical device that:
(A) is not continuously connected to the Internet; and
(B) enables an individual to secure and transfer digital
assets; or
(2) a physical device that enables the owner of digital assets to
retain independent control over the digital assets.
Sec. 4. "Licensed payment stablecoin issuer", or "licensee"
means a person that is licensed under IC 28-16-2-4.
Sec. 5. "Software wallet" means a software application that:
(1) enables an individual to secure and transfer digital assets;
or
(2) enables the owner of digital assets to retain independent
control over the digital assets.
Chapter 2. Regulation of Stablecoin
Sec. 1. This chapter does not apply to a permitted payment
stablecoin issuer to the extent that federal law precludes or
preempts the application of this chapter.
Sec. 2. A payment stablecoin may be issued in Indiana only by
a licensed payment stablecoin issuer.
Sec. 3. (a) This section does not apply to any of the following:
(1) A direct transfer of a digital asset between two (2)
individuals acting on the individuals' own behalf and for the
individuals' own lawful purposes, without the involvement of
an intermediary.
(2) A transaction involving transfer of a digital asset by an
individual between:
EH 1217—LS 7003/DI 119


(A) an account in the United States; and
(B) an account outside the United States;
that are held by the individual and that are administered by
the same entity.
(3) A transaction conducted by means of a hardware wallet or
software wallet that facilitates an individual's custody of
digital assets.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (a), beginning July 1, 2028,
a digital asset service provider may not offer or sell in Indiana a
payment stablecoin that is not issued by a licensed payment
stablecoin issuer.
Sec. 4. (a) The department shall:
(1) establish standards and processes for:
(A) licensure of persons to act as permitted payment
stablecoin issuers in Indiana, including examination and
qualification standards and processes; and
(B) regulation and supervision of licensed payment
stablecoin issuers in Indiana;
that prioritize the financial soundness of licensed payment
stablecoin issuers; and
(2) receive and evaluate applications submitted by applicants
to the department for licensure as a permitted payment
stablecoin issuer in Indiana.
(b) A person that wishes to be licensed as a permitted payment
stablecoin issuer in Indiana must submit an application for
licensure to the department in the form and manner prescribed by
the department.
(c) The department shall evaluate an application for licensure
submitted under subsection (b) as follows:
(1) The department shall determine whether the application
is substantially complete. An application is substantially
complete for purposes of this subdivision if the application
contains sufficient information for the department to render
a decision regarding the factors set forth in subdivision (2).
(2) If the department finds an application to be substantially
complete under subdivision (1), the department shall evaluate
the application based on the following criteria:
(A) The ability of the applicant, based on the applicant's
financial condition and resources, to meet the
requirements set forth under 12 U.S.C. 5903.
(B) Whether an officer or director of the applicant has
been convicted of a felony offense involving insider
EH 1217—LS 7003/DI 119


trading, embezzlement, cybercrime, money laundering,
financing of terrorism, or financial fraud.
(C) The competence, experience, and integrity of the
officers, directors, and principal shareholders of the
applicant, of any subsidiaries of the applicant, and of any
parent company of the applicant, including:
(i) the record of the officers', directors', and principal
shareholders' compliance with state and federal laws and
regulations; and
(ii) the ability of the officers, directors, and principal
shareholders to fulfill any commitments to, and any
conditions imposed by, the department in connection
with licensure as a permitted payment stablecoin issuer
in Indiana.
(D) Whether the redemption policy of the applicant meets
the standards set forth under 12 U.S.C. 5903.
(E) Any other factors established under federal regulations
or by the department that are necessary to ensure the
applicant's financial soundness as a permitted payment
stablecoin issuer.
(d) Not later than thirty (30) days after receiving an application
for licensure under subsection (b), the department shall notify the
applicant as to:
(1) whether the department considers the application to be
substantially complete under subsection (c)(1); and
(2) if the application is not substantially complete, the
additional information the applicant must provide in order
for the application to be considered substantially complete.
(e) If the department finds an application for licensure under
subsection (b) to be substantially complete, the department shall
consider the application to no longer be substantially complete only
if there is a material change in circumstances sufficient to require
the department to treat the application as a new application.
(f) Not later than one hundred twenty (120) days after receiving
a substantially complete application for licensure under subsection
(b), the department shall:
(1) either approve or deny the application; and
(2) notify the applicant of the department's approval or denial
of the application.
(g) The department shall deny a substantially complete
application for licensure under subsection (b) only if the
department finds, based on the factors under subsection (c)(2), that
EH 1217—LS 7003/DI 119


the operations of the applicant as a permitted payment stablecoin
issuer would be financially unsound. The department shall not
consider issuance of payment stablecoins on an open, public, or
decentralized network to be a ground for finding that the
operations of an applicant as a permitted payment stablecoin issuer
would be financially unsound.
(h) Not later than thirty (30) days after the date on which the
department notifies an applicant of the department's denial of the
applicant's application for licensure under subsection (g), the
department shall provide the applicant with written notice
explaining the reasons for the denial with specificity, including:
(1) all findings made by the department with respect to all
identified material shortcomings in the application; and
(2) actionable recommendations as to how the applicant can
address the identified material shortcomings.
(i) Not later than thirty (30) days after an applicant receives a
notice under subsection (h), the applicant may request, in writing,
an opportunity to appeal the denial in an oral hearing before the
department.
(j) Upon the department's receipt of an applicant's timely
request under subsection (i), the department shall provide the
applicant notice of the time, which may not be later than thirty (30)
days after the date on which the department receives the request,
and place at which the applicant may appear, personally or
through counsel, to submit written materials or provide oral
testimony and oral argument in appeal of the denial.
(k) Not later than sixty (60) days after the date of an applicant's
hearing under subsection (j), the department shall provide the
applicant with notice of the department's final determination,
which must contain a statement of the basis for the department's
determination, including the department's specific findings.
(l) If an applicant does not make a timely request for a hearing
under subsection (i), the department shall notify the applicant in
writing, not later than ten (10) days after the date by which the
applicant's request for a hearing must be made under subsection
(i), that the denial of the applicant's application is the final
determination of the department.
(m) If the department fails to notify an applicant of the
department's approval or denial of the applicant's substantially
complete application within the time period specified in subsection
(f), the application is considered approved.
(n) The denial of an applicant's application under this section
EH 1217—LS 7003/DI 119


does not prohibit the applicant from filing a subsequent application
for licensure under this section.
(o) The department shall:
(1) notify the governor when the department begins
processing applications under this chapter; and
(2) not later than January 1 of each year, report to the general
assembly, in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6, regarding
any application for licensure under this chapter:
(A) that, as of December 31 of the immediately preceding
year, has been pending for one hundred eighty (180) days
or more since the date on which the application was
initially submitted; and
(B) for which the applicant has been informed that the
application is not substantially complete;
including documentation on the status of the application and
why the application has not yet been approved.
(p) A person licensed as a permitted payment stablecoin issuer
under this chapter is not required to obtain any other license or
charter to act as a permitted payment stablecoin issuer in Indiana.
Sec. 5. (a) Not later than one hundred eighty (180) days after the
date on which a licensed payment stablecoin issuer's application
for licensure is approved under section 4 of this chapter, and not
later than one hundred eighty (180) days after that date in each
year thereafter, the licensed payment stablecoin issuer shall file
with the department a certification that the licensed payment
stablecoin issuer has implemented anti-money laundering and
economic sanctions compliance programs that are reasonably
designed to prevent the licensed payment stablecoin issuer from
facilitating:
(1) money laundering, particularly with regard to money
laundering for cartels and organizations designated as foreign
terrorist organizations under 8 U.S.C. 1189; and
(2) the financing of terrorist activities;
in accordance with the requirements of 12 U.S.C. 5901 et seq.
(b) The department shall make certifications filed under
subsection (a) available to the United States Department of the
Treasury upon request by the United States Department of the
Treasury.
(c) The department may revoke the department's approval of a
person's application for licensure under section 4 of this chapter if
the person fails to file the certification required under subsection
(a) not later than one hundred eighty (180) days after the date on
EH 1217—LS 7003/DI 119


which the department approves the person's application.
Sec. 6. (a) The department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this chapter, including for the purpose of recovering the
cost of administering and enforcing this chapter by imposing and
collecting proportionate and equitable fees and costs associated
with receiving and evaluating applications, conducting
examinations, conducting investigations, and other actions
required to achieve the purposes of this chapter.
(b) The department may conduct an examination or
investigation of a licensed payment stablecoin issuer or otherwise
take independent action authorized by this chapter as reasonably
necessary or appropriate to administer and enforce this chapter,
the department's rules implementing this chapter, and other state
and federal law applicable to this chapter.
(c) To carry out the purposes of this chapter, the department
may do any of the following:
(1) Enter into agreements or relationships with other state
and federal government officials, regulatory agencies, and
regulatory associations for the purpose of regulatory
efficiency through standardization of methods and procedures
and sharing of resources, records, or related information
obtained under this chapter.
(2) Conduct examinations in conjunction with other state or
federal government agencies.
(3) Use, hire, contract for, or employ analytical personnel,
systems, methods, and software to examine or investigate
licensed payment stablecoin issuers.
(4) Incorporate:
(A) licensing, examination, and investigation reports from
other state or federal government agencies and officials;
and
(B) audit reports regarding licensees and applicants for
licensure under this chapter from independent certified
public accountants and other qualified third-party
auditors;
into the department's examination or investigation reports.
(5) Summon and examine an individual under oath and
require the individual to produce records regarding any
matter related to the condition and business of a licensed
payment stablecoin issuer or authorized delegate of a licensed
payment stablecoin issuer.
(d) Rules adopted by the department to regulate licensed
EH 1217—LS 7003/DI 119


payment stablecoin issuers must, at minimum, ensure that licensed
payment stablecoin issuers are in compliance with federal laws and
regulations applicable to permitted payment stablecoin issuers.
(e) The department shall provide notice to licensed payment
stablecoin issuers of any changes in federal laws and regulations
applicable to permitted payment stablecoin issuers.
Sec. 7. (a) A licensed payment stablecoin issuer shall provide to
the department, at the department's request, and at the location
and in the format specified by the department, any record the
department reasonably requires to conduct a complete
examination for purposes of this chapter. The department may
utilize multistate record production standards and examination
procedures if the standards will reasonably achieve the
requirements of this chapter.
(b) Unless otherwise directed by the department, a licensed
payment stablecoin issuer shall pay all costs reasonably incurred
in connection with an examination of the licensed payment
stablecoin issuer, or of an authorized delegate of the licensed
payment stablecoin issuer, under this chapter.
Sec. 8. (a) The department may suspend or revoke a license
issued under this chapter if:
(1) the licensee violates this chapter or a rule adopted or order
issued under this chapter;
(2) the licensee does not cooperate with an examination or
investigation by the department;
(3) the licensee engages in fraud, intentional
misrepresentation, or gross negligence;
(4) the competence, experience, character, or general fitness
of:
(A) the licensee; or
(B) a:
(i) person in control;
(ii) key individual; or
(iii) responsible person;
of the licensee or of an authorized delegate of the licensee;
indicates that it is not in the public interest to permit the
person to issue payment stablecoins;
(5) the licensee engages in an unsafe or unsound practice; or
(6) the licensee is insolvent, suspends payment of the licensee's
obligations, or makes a general assignment for the benefit of
the licensee's creditors.
(b) In determining whether a licensee is engaging in an unsafe
EH 1217—LS 7003/DI 119


or unsound practice for purposes of subsection (a)(5), the
department may consider the size and condition of the licensee's
payment stablecoin issuance, the magnitude of a loss, the severity
of a violation of this chapter, and the previous conduct of the
licensee or other person responsible for the violation.
(c) If the department determines that a violation of this chapter,
or of a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter, by a
licensee is likely to:
(1) cause immediate and irreparable harm to:
(A) the licensee;
(B) the licensee's customers; or
(C) the public; or
(2) cause insolvency or significant dissipation of assets of the
licensee;
the department may issue an order requiring the licensee to cease
and desist from the violation.
(d) If the department has reason to believe that a person who is
not licensed under this chapter is engaging in an activity for which
a license is required under this chapter:
(1) the department may issue an order to the person to show
cause as to why the department should not issue an order
requiring the person to cease and desist from the activity; or
(2) if the department determines that the person's activity is
likely to cause immediate and irreparable harm, the
department may petition a court for ex parte issuance of an
order temporarily enjoining the person from engaging in the
activity.
(e) An order issued by the department with regard to a person
under subsection (c) or (d):
(1) is effective upon service of the order on the person;
(2) expires ten (10) days after the order is issued unless the
department commences an administrative review of the order
under IC 4-21.5; and
(3) remains effective and enforceable pending the completion
of an administrative review under subdivision (2).
(f) A person that is served with an order to cease and desist
under this section may petition a court for a judicial order setting
aside, limiting, or suspending the enforcement, operation, or
effectiveness of the order pending the completion of an
administrative proceeding under subsection (e)(2).
Sec. 9. The department may enter into a consent order with a
person at any time to resolve a matter arising under this chapter
EH 1217—LS 7003/DI 119


or under a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter. A
consent order under this section:
(1) must be signed by the person to whom the consent order
is issued or by the person's authorized representative;
(2) must indicate the person's agreement with the terms set
forth in the consent order; and
(3) may provide that the consent order does not constitute an
admission by the person of a violation of this chapter or of a
rule adopted or order issued under this chapter.
Sec. 10. (a) A person that intentionally:
(1) makes a false statement, misrepresentation, or false
certification; or
(2) makes a false entry or omits a material entry;
in a record filed or required to be maintained under this chapter,
including a certification filed under section 5 of this chapter,
commits a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) A person that:
(1) is not licensed under this chapter;
(2) knowingly engages in an activity for which a license is
required under this chapter; and
(3) receives not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750)
within a thirty (30) day period as a result of the activity under
subdivision (2);
commits a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) A person that:
(1) is not licensed under this chapter;
(2) knowingly engages in an activity for which a license is
required under this chapter; and
(3) receives more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750)
within a thirty (30) day period as a result of the activity under
subdivision (2);
commits a Level 6 felony.
(d) If the department determines, after notice to the person and
an opportunity for the person to be heard, that a person has
violated this chapter, the department may, in addition to or instead
of all other remedies available under this chapter, impose upon the
person a civil penalty in an amount equal to:
(1) not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per
violation; plus
(2) the department's cost of investigating and prosecuting the
violation, including the department's reasonable attorney's
fees.
EH 1217—LS 7003/DI 119


Sec. 11. The following apply to an insolvency proceeding
regarding a licensed payment stablecoin issuer:
(1) Subject to subdivision (3), the claim of a person holding
payment stablecoins issued by the licensed payment stablecoin
issuer has priority, in ratable proportion to the claims of
other persons holding payment stablecoins issued by the
licensed payment stablecoin issuer, over the claims of the
licensed payment stablecoin issuer and any other claimant
against the licensed payment stablecoin issuer, with respect to
the licensed payment stablecoin issuer's required reserves
under 12 U.S.C. 5903.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person
holding a payment stablecoin issued by the licensed payment
stablecoin issuer has a valid claim against the licensed
payment stablecoin issuer.
(3) Subdivision (1) does not apply to claims other than those
arising directly from the holding of payment stablecoins.
SECTION 3. IC 35-52-28-15 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. IC 28-16-2-10 defines a crime
concerning payment stablecoin.
EH 1217—LS 7003/DI 119


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Financial Institutions, to which
was referred House Bill 1217, has had the same under consideration
and begs leave to report the same back to the House with the
recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Page 1, between the enacting clause and line 1, begin a new
paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 1. IC 28-8-7.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 7.1. Payment of Interest or Yield on Stablecoin
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "foreign payment stablecoin
issuer" has the meaning set forth in 12 U.S.C. 5901(12).
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "permitted payment stablecoin
issuer" has the meaning set forth in 12 U.S.C. 5901(23).
Sec. 3. A permitted payment stablecoin issuer, foreign payment
stablecoin issuer, or person acting on behalf of a permitted
payment stablecoin issuer or foreign payment stablecoin issuer
may not:
(1) pay to a person that holds a payment stablecoin any form
of:
(A) interest; or
(B) yield, whether in cash, tokens, or other consideration;
or
(2) provide a person that holds a payment stablecoin an
economic benefit of any kind;
in connection with the person's holding, use, or retention of the
payment stablecoin.".
Page 2, line 10, delete "licensed" and insert "permitted".
Page 2, line 12, delete "chapter to a permitted payment" and insert
"chapter.".
Page 2, delete line 13.
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1217 as introduced.)
TESHKA
Committee Vote: yeas 11, nays 0.
EH 1217—LS 7003/DI 119


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Insurance and Financial
Institutions, to which was referred House Bill No. 1217, has had the
same under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
Senate with the recommendation that said bill DO PASS and be
reassigned to the Senate Committee on Appropriations.
(Reference is to HB 1217 as printed January 13, 2026.)
BALDWIN, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 6, Nays 2
_____
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Appropriations, to which
was referred Engrossed House Bill No. 1217, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with
the recommendation that said bill DO PASS.
(Reference is to EHB 1217 as printed February 13, 2026.)
MISHLER, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 8, Nays 2
EH 1217—LS 7003/DI 119